Louisiana, session 2026, HB934.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 56:129 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§129. Possession of native wildlife
Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the following
native wildlife may be lawfully possessed:
(1) Native wildlife captured by hand from the wild in Louisiana may be kept
with the following restrictions:
(a) No more than six per household of any combination of the following
animals may be possessed:
(i) Hand-captured opossum, rabbit, raccoon, and squirrel.
(ii) Whitetail deer.
(iii) Hand-captured native nongame wildlife.
(b) It is unlawful to remove such wildlife or their offspring from Louisiana.
(c) The sale or transfer of such wildlife or their offspring is prohibited.
(2) All wildlife possessed in captivity shall be maintained in enclosures,
pens, or cages that are sufficiently strong to prevent escape of the wildlife and that
will simultaneously protect the wildlife from injury.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1131 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 934
(3) All adult deer kept in compliance with this Section shall be confined in
an enclosure that complies with the following requirements:
(a) Enclosures shall have a perimeter fence that is not less than eight feet in
height and shall be constructed so as to prohibit the escape of confined cervids and
the ingress of native cervids.
(b) The area of the enclosure shall not be less than two hundred square feet
for the first cervid and shall be increased in size by one hundred fifty square feet for
each additional cervid.
(4) It is unlawful for anyone to keep a native wildlife animal under inhumane
or unhealthy conditions.